apertium-bre.bre.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>AaBbChchC’hc’hDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLlMmNnOoPpRrSsTtUuVvWwYyZzùÙêÊñÑâÂîÎôÔûÛüÜ’ÇçÉéÈèXxQqÏïœæàÀáÁèÈéÉËëăắẵặấầẩậǎåäãąāảạḃḇćĉčďḋđḍḏɗðĕếềễểệěẽėęēḗẹəğĝǧġḡƣȟħḩḥḫíìĭǐĩīỉịıĵǩḳḵľŀłļḷṃńňṅņṇŋóòŏốồỗổộǒöőõøǫōṓỏọơớờợɔºṗřṛśšşṣſßťŧţṭṯúŭǔůǚűũūủụṷưừữửựŵýỳŷÿȳȝ</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"       c="Nom"/>
    <sdef n="np"      c="Nom propre"/>
    <sdef n="num"     c="Numeral"/>
    <sdef n="mf"      c="Masculin/feminin"/>
    <sdef n="m"       c="Gourel (Masculin)"/>
    <sdef n="f"       c="Benel (Feminin)"/>
    <sdef n="sg"      c="Singular"/>
    <sdef n="pl"      c="Plural"/>
    <sdef n="sp"      c="Singular/plural"/>
    <sdef n="acr"     c="Acronimo"/>
    <sdef n="top"     c="Toponym"/>
    <sdef n="ant"     c="Anthroponym"/>
    <sdef n="cog"     c="Cognomen"/>
    <sdef n="abbr"    c="Abbreviations"/>
    <sdef n="barb"    c="Barbarismes"/>
    <sdef n="sym"     c="Symbols"/>
    <sdef n="foc"     c="Focus"/>
    <sdef n="al"      c="Autres"/>
    <sdef n="pr"      c="Preposition"/>
    <sdef n="cnjcoo"  c="Conjonction de coordination"/>
    <sdef n="cnjsub"  c="Conjonction de subordination"/>
    <sdef n="cnjadv"  c="Conjonction adverbial"/>
    <sdef n="prn"     c="Pronom"/>
    <sdef n="subj"    c="Subjet"/>
    <sdef n="obj"     c="Objet"/>
    <sdef n="rel"     c="Relatif"/>
    <sdef n="opt"     c="Optatif"/>
    <sdef n="ppres"   c="Present participle"/>
    <sdef n="neg"     c="Negatif"/>
    <sdef n="ref"     c="Reflexif"/>
    <sdef n="ij"      c="Interjection"/>
    <sdef n="adv"     c="Adverbe"/>
    <sdef n="preadv"  c="Preadverbe"/>
    <sdef n="adj"     c="Adjectif"/>
    <sdef n="sint"    c="Synthetic"/>
    <sdef n="comp"    c="Comparatif"/>
    <sdef n="sup"     c="Superlatif"/>
    <sdef n="excl"    c="Exclamatif"/>
    <sdef n="itg"     c="Interrogatif"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"   c="Verb"/>
    <sdef n="vbloc"   c="Verb (locative form)"/>
    <sdef n="vpart"   c="Verbal particle"/>
    <sdef n="inf"     c="Infinitif"/>
    <sdef n="pri"     c="Present indicative"/>
    <sdef n="pii"     c="Imperfect"/>
    <sdef n="prh"     c="Present habitual"/>
    <sdef n="pih"     c="Imperfect habitual"/>
    <sdef n="cni"     c="Conditional"/>
    <sdef n="cip"     c="Past conditional"/>
    <sdef n="imp"     c="Imperative"/>
    <sdef n="past"    c="Past definite"/>
    <sdef n="pp"      c="Past participle"/>
    <sdef n="fti"     c="Future indicative"/>
    <sdef n="ger"     c="Particle for present participle"/>
    <sdef n="p1"      c="1st person"/>
    <sdef n="p2"      c="2nd person"/>
    <sdef n="p3"      c="3rd person"/>
    <sdef n="impers"  c="Impersonal"/>
    <sdef n="det"     c="Determiner"/>
    <sdef n="predet"  c="Pre-determiner"/>
    <sdef n="ind"     c="Indefinite"/>
    <sdef n="def"     c="Definite"/>
    <sdef n="dem"     c="Demonstratif"/>
    <sdef n="pos"     c="Possessive"/>
    <sdef n="ord"     c="Ordinal"/>
    <sdef n="cm"      c="Coma"/>
    <sdef n="apos"    c="Apostrophe"/>
    <sdef n="guio"    c="Hyphen"/>
    <sdef n="lpar"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="percent" c="Percentage"/>
    <sdef n="rpar"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="lquot"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="quot"    c=""/>
    <sdef n="rquot"   c=""/>
    <sdef n="sent"    c="End of sentence marker"/>
    <sdef n="ND"/>
    <sdef n="GD"/>
  </sdefs>
  <pardefs>

    <pardef n="personas">
      <e><re>[A-Z][a-zë]+ Le [A-Z][a-zë]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>It</l><r>It</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>It.It</l><r>It.It</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Dim</l><r>Dim</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Dim.Dim</l><r>Dim.Dim</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an<b/>dimezell<b/></l><r>an<b/>dimezell<b/></r></p><re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an<b/>itron<b/></l><r>an<b/>itron<b/></r></p><re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an<b/>aotrou<b/></l><r>an<b/>aotrou<b/></r></p><re>[A-Z][a-z]+</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ao</l><r>Ao</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ao.Ao</l><r>Ao.Ao</r></p><re>.? ([A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z][a-z]*|[A-Z][a-z]* [A-Z].? [A-Z][a-z]*)</re><p><l/><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="horas">
      <e><re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re><p><l>e.</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-2]?[0-9]</re><p><l><b/>e.</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="distàncies">
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l><b/>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>km</l><r><b/>km<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l><b/>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>cm</l><r><b/>cm<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l><b/>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>mm</l><r><b/>mm<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="fechas">
      <e><re>1</re><p><l>añ</l><r>añ<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>2</re><p><l>l</l><r>l<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[34]</re><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anys_nosuffix">
      <e><re>[MCDXLVI]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anys">
      <e><re>[MCDXLVI]+</re><p><l>vet</l><r>vet<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><re>[MCDXLVI]+</re><p><l>de</l><r>de<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- COMPROVAR IIIde kantved -->
      <e><re>[I]+</re><p><l>añ</l><r>añ<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[½¼⅛]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><re>[¾⅝⅜⅞]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><p><l>1</l><r>1<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+</re><p><l>vet</l><r>vet<s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> 
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l>%</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+( [0-9]+)+</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[0-9]+°</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="acronimos">
      <e><re>[A-Z][A-Z]+([A-Z])?</re><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[A-Z][0-9]+([0-9])?</re><p><l/><r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e><re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z\-]+([.][a-z\-]+)+)</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e><par n="anys_nosuffix"/></e>
    <e>
      <par n="horas"/> <!-- Horas -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="anys"/> <!-- Anys -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="fechas"/> <!-- Fechas -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="numeros"/> <!-- Numbers -->
    </e>
    <e>
      <par n="acronimos"/> <!-- Acronyms -->
    </e>
    <e><par n="urls"/></e>
    <e><par n="distàncies"/></e>
    <e><par n="personas"/></e>
